District of Columbia statutes.
8-231.18

Rulemaking.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided, the Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

(b)

Notwithstanding the requirements of § 2-552(c), where the Mayor chooses to adopt a federal regulation as the District’s standard under this subchapter, the Mayor may do so by incorporating the federal regulation by reference in the Notice of Intent to take rulemaking action. When incorporating the federal regulation by reference, the notice shall include a specific indication of how and where a paper or electronic copy of such document may be inspected or obtained. Any amendments to the incorporated federal rules shall be deemed to be included in the District’s rules; provided, that after the initial adoption of the federal regulation, the Mayor shall annually issue a Notice of Intent to re-adopt the federal standard, in whole or in part, or announce an intent to adopt a different standard.

Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-381, § 19, 56 DCR 1596